Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-705, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (10A O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1-4-705), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-705. A. In placing a child in the custody of an


individual, a private agency, or institution, the court and the


Department of Human Services shall, if possible, select a person,


agency, or institution in the following order of precedence:


1. A member of the child’s family related by no more than the


third degree of consanguinity or affinity, or fourth degree of


consanguinity or affinity in the case of first cousins;



Req. No. 2535 Page 1


2. A member of a local religious or faith-based community of


the child’s family;


3. An institution governed by persons of the same religious


faith as that of the parents of the child, or in case of a


difference in the religious faith of the parents, then of the


religious faith of the child; or


4. An individual, private agency, or institution the court and


the Department determines will best serve the intent described in


Section 1-1-102 of this title.


B. Except as otherwise provided by this section or by law, it


shall be left to the discretion of the judge to place the custody of


children where their total needs will best be served. If an


individual meets the minimum required age for placement purposes,


the age of an otherwise eligible individual shall not be a reason


for denying the individual placement or custody of a child.


C. A prospective foster or adoptive parent shall not be an


approved placement for a child if the prospective foster or adoptive


parent or any other person residing in the home of the prospective


foster or adoptive parent has been convicted of any of the following


felony offenses:


1. Within the five-year period preceding the application date,


a physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense;


2. Child abuse or neglect;


3. Domestic abuse;

Req. No. 2535 Page 2


4. A crime against a child, including, but not limited to,


child sexual abuse material; or


5. A crime involving violence, including, but not limited to,


rape, sexual assault or homicide, but excluding those crimes


specified in paragraph 1 of this subsection.


D. 1. Under no circumstances shall a child be placed with or


in the custody of an individual subject to the Oklahoma Sex


Offenders Registration Act or an individual who is married to or


living with an individual subject to the Oklahoma Sex Offenders


Registration Act.


2. In addition, prior to the court placing a child in the


custody of an individual, the court shall inquire as to whether the


individual has been previously convicted of any felony or relevant


misdemeanor or has any felony or misdemeanor charges pending.


3. Prior to the custody order being entered, the individual


seeking custody shall provide an Oklahoma criminal history record


obtained pursuant to Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes to the court.


4. For purposes of this subsection the terms:


a. “relevant misdemeanor” may include assault and


battery, alcohol- or drug-related offenses, domestic


violence or other offenses involving the use of


physical force or violence against the person or


property of another, and

Req. No. 2535 Page 3


b. “individual” shall not include a parent or legal


guardian of the child.


E. A prospective foster or adoptive parent shall not be an


approved placement for a child if the prospective foster or adoptive


parent is an employee of the Department, or a relative of an


employee of the Department to the third degree of consanguinity or


affinity, or the fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity in the


case of first cousins. Such prohibition shall apply for a period of


two (2) years following the termination of employment with the


Department.


F. The provisions of this section shall not apply in any


paternity or domestic relations case, unless otherwise ordered by


the court.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2535 TEK 12/29/2025 2:46:59 PM

















Req. No. 2535 Page 4